Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6002.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2512e. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), any advertisement to buy, sell, exchange, rent, lease, or mortgage real property or a business opportunity by a real estate broker shall must include the broker's name or the name under which the broker is conducting business, ; shall include the broker's telephone number or street address, ; and shall state a statement that the person doing the advertising is a real estate broker. (2) An individual who is licensed as a real estate broker or associate real estate broker may advertise real property that he or she the individual personally owns for sale or for lease in his or her the individual's own name, and is not required to include the name of the real estate broker, or the name of the real estate broker that employs the associate real estate broker, as the sales or leasing agent for the property in the advertisement. However, the advertising shall must indicate affirmatively that the individual who is selling or leasing the real property is a licensed real estate broker or associate real estate broker. (3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) or (4), a real estate salesperson or an associate broker shall only advertise to buy, sell, exchange, rent, lease, or mortgage real property or a business opportunity under the supervision of, and in the business name of, his or her the real estate salesperson's or associate broker's employing broker. Any advertising displayed or published on or after January 1, 2018, that includes the name of an associate broker, a salesperson, or a cooperating group of associate brokers or salespersons employed by the same real estate broker, shall must include all of the following: (a) The telephone number or street address of the employing broker. (b) The business name of the employing broker, in equal or greater type size than the name of the associate broker, salesperson, or cooperating group. (4) A real estate salesperson shall not advertise to sell real property under his or her the real estate salesperson's own name unless the property is the principal residence of the salesperson. A real estate salesperson shall not advertise real property for rent or lease under his or her the real estate salesperson's own name unless the salesperson is the owner of the property. (5) A real estate broker shall not conduct business or advertise under a name other than that in which the broker's license is issued or under an assumed name that is authorized by law. A real estate broker shall notify the department of its the real estate broker's adoption of an assumed name with its the real estate broker's license application, or within not later than 30 days after it the real estate broker adopts an assumed name, whichever is earlier. (6) An advertisement or real estate listing to sell or mortgage real property must include the estimated annual real property taxes on the property based on the state equalized value of the property in the most recent property tax assessment. The advertisement or real estate listing must include the estimated annual property tax if the property is not claimed as a principal residence and if the property is claimed as a principal residence under section 7cc of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7cc. As used in this subsection, "estimated annual real property tax" means the calculation of the estimated tax to be paid on the property without any reduction in the state equalized value for the limitation of increases in the taxable value under section 3 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, and including the current applicable millage rate.